Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-286.01
Foreign limited partnerships; sections applicable.

Sections 67-243 and 67-246 shall be applicable to foreign limited partnerships as if they were domestic limited partnerships.

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 57.